Florida, session 2026, SB118.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 125.0168, Florida Statutes, is amended 18 to read: 19 125.0168âSpecial assessments levied on recreational vehicle 20 parks regulated under chapter 513.âWhen a county levies a non-ad 21 valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle park 22 regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special 23 assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 24 recreational vehicle park is comprised of residential units. 25 Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under chapter 513 26 shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same manner as a 27 hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The non-ad valorem 28 special assessment may not be levied against the portion of a 29 recreational vehicle parking space or campsite which exceeds the 30 maximum square footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit 31 pursuant to s. 320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the 32 recreational vehicle parking space or campsite. A county shall 33 consider the recreational vehicle parkâs occupancy rates to 34 ensure that any special assessment is fairly and reasonably 35 apportioned among the recreational vehicle parks receiving the 36 special benefit. 37 Section 2.âSection 166.223, Florida Statutes, is amended to 38 read: 39 166.223âSpecial assessments levied on recreational vehicle 40 parks regulated under chapter 513.âWhen a municipality levies a 41 non-ad valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle park 42 regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special 43 assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 44 recreational vehicle park is comprised of residential units. 45 Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under chapter 513 46 shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same manner as a 47 hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The non-ad valorem 48 special assessment may not be levied against the portion of a 49 recreational vehicle parking space or campsite which exceeds the 50 maximum square footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit 51 pursuant to s. 320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the 52 recreational vehicle parking space or campsite. A municipality 53 shall consider the recreational vehicle parkâs occupancy rates 54 to ensure that any special assessment is fairly and reasonably 55 apportioned among the recreational vehicle parks receiving the 56 special benefit. 57 Section 3.âSection 189.052, Florida Statutes, is amended to 58 read: 59 189.052âAssessments levied on facilities regulated under 60 chapter 513.âWhen an independent or dependent special district 61 levies an assessment on a facility regulated under chapter 513, 62 the assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 63 facility is comprised of residential units. Instead, facilities 64 regulated under chapter 513 shall be assessed in the same manner 65 as a hotel, motel, or other similar facility. The assessment may 66 not be levied against the portion of a recreational vehicle 67 parking space or campsite which exceeds the maximum square 68 footage of a recreational vehicle-type unit pursuant to s. 69 320.01(1)(b), regardless of the size of the recreational vehicle 70 parking space or campsite. A special district shall consider the 71 recreational vehicle parkâs occupancy rates to ensure that any 72 assessment is fairly and reasonably apportioned among the 73 recreational vehicle parks receiving the special benefit. 74 Section 4.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 125.0168, 75 166.223, and 189.052, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2026 76 property tax roll. 77 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.